Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1337
Short title.

Sections 25-1337 to 25-1348 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 1.